Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1278SV (1) 91 ll/jh S.F. 256 Section 1. Section 650.14, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 650.14 Boundaries by acquiescence established. 3 If it is found that the boundaries and corners alleged to 4 have been recognized and acquiesced in for ten years have been 5 so recognized and acquiesced in, such recognized boundaries and 6 corners shall be permanently established. This section shall 7 be self-executing. Once an acquiesced boundary and corners 8 have been permanently established, subsequent common ownership 9 of the adjacent tracts, separated by the acquiesced boundary, 10 does not terminate the acquiesced boundary and corners. The 11 acquiesced boundary and corners shall continue unless adjoining 12 parties have recognized and acquiesced in subsequent boundaries 13 and corners for ten years, then such subsequent recognized 14 and acquiesced boundaries and corners shall be permanently 15 established. 16